Idaho, session 2025, H0051.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-2320, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2320. PROFESSIONAL SERVICE CONTRACTS WITH DESIGN PROFESSIONALS,
CONSTRUCTION MANAGERS, AND PROFESSIONAL LAND SURVEYORS. (1) Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law to the contrary, it shall be the policy of this
state that all public agencies and political subdivisions of the state of
Idaho and their agents shall make selections for professional engineering,
architectural, landscape architecture, construction management, and pro-
fessional land surveying services, including services by persons licensed
pursuant to chapters 3, 12, 30, and 45, title 54, Idaho Code, on the basis of
qualifications and demonstrated competence and shall negotiate contracts or
agreements for such services.
(2) In carrying out this policy, public agencies and political subdi-
visions of the state shall use the following minimum guidelines in securing
contracts for engineering, architectural, landscape architecture, con-
struction management, and land surveying services on projects for which the
professional service fee is anticipated to exceed the total sum of fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), exclud-
ing professional services contracts previously awarded for an associated or
phased project, and for which the expenditure is otherwise exempt from the
bidding process provided by law. To implement this policy, the public agency
and political subdivisions shall:
(a) Provide a general description of the services being solicited and
encourage persons or firms engaged in the services being solicited to
submit statements of qualifications and past performance data;
(b) Establish and make available to the public a request for qualifica-
tions that includes the criteria and the procedures to be used for mea-
surable scoring, ranking, and selection of qualified persons or firms
to perform such services;
(c) After receiving responses to a request for qualifications, score
and rank the responding persons or firms based on their qualifica-
tions and demonstrated competence pursuant to the public agency's or
political subdivision's established criteria and procedures. The
list of ranked respondents, including the scoring used to develop the
ranking, shall be made available to the public. Some examples of se-
lection criteria for consideration may include but are not limited


to: a description of the firm, including location and longevity; past
performance; project manager and key staff experience, education,
and training; experience with similar projects; specific approach to
project or assignment; proposed schedule, if applicable; and quality
control procedures;
(d) Select for negotiation the persons or firms whom the public agency
or political subdivision determines to be the highest-ranked (best
qualified);
(e) Negotiate with the highest-ranked person or firm for a contract
or an agreement to perform such services at a price determined by the
public agency or political subdivision to be reasonable and fair to
the public after considering the estimated value, scope, complexity,
schedule, and nature of the services required;
(f) When unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract or agreement with
the highest-ranked person or firm, formally terminate negotiations and
undertake negotiations with the next highest-ranked person or firm,
following the procedure prescribed in paragraph (e) of this subsection;
(g) When unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract or agreement with
any of the selected persons or firms, recommence negotiations as de-
scribed in paragraphs (e) and (f) of this subsection until a contract or
agreement is reached or cancel the procurement;
(h) When a public agency or political subdivision solicits a request
for qualifications for engineering, architectural, landscape ar-
chitecture, construction management, or land surveying services for
which the professional service fee is anticipated to exceed the total
sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000), it shall publish public notice in the same manner as re-
quired for procurement of public works construction projects under
section 67-2805(2), Idaho Code;
(i) In fulfilling the requirements of paragraphs (a) through (h) of
this subsection, a public agency or political subdivision may estab-
lish and select from a list of two (2) or more persons or firms selected
and preapproved for consideration by the public agency or political
subdivision. In establishing a preapproved list, a public agency or
political subdivision shall publish notice as set forth in paragraph
(h) of this subsection. When selecting from such list, no notice shall
be required; and
(j) Any list established under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall
remain valid for a maximum of five (5) years and may be canceled by the
public agency or political subdivision prior to the list's expiration
if the public agency or political subdivision determines that cancella-
tion would be in the public's interest.
(3) In securing contracts for engineering, architectural, landscape
architecture, construction management, or land surveying services on
projects for which the professional service fee is anticipated to be less
than the total sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000), the public agency or political subdivision may use the
guidelines set forth in subsection (2) of this section or establish its own
guidelines for selection based on demonstrated competence and qualifica-
tions to perform the type of services required, followed by negotiation of


the fee at a price determined by the public agency or political subdivision
to be fair and reasonable after considering the estimated value, scope, com-
plexity, schedule, and nature of services required.
(4) When a public agency or political subdivision of the state has pre-
viously awarded a professional services contract to a person or firm for an
associated or phased project, the public agency or political subdivision
may, at its discretion and in accordance with all provisions of section
59-1026, Idaho Code, negotiate an extended or new professional services
contract with that person or firm.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Public agency" means the state of Idaho and any departments, com-
missions, boards, authorities, bureaus, universities, colleges, edu-
cational institutions, or other state agencies that have been created
by or pursuant to statute other than courts and their agencies and di-
visions, and the judicial council and the district magistrates commis-
sion; and
(b) "Political subdivision" means any entity defined as a political
subdivision under section 6-902, Idaho Code, or any other district or
municipality of any nature whatsoever having the power to levy taxes or
assessment, organized under any general or special law of this state.
The enumeration of certain districts in this section shall not be
construed to exclude other districts or municipalities from this defi-
nition.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.